Utah statutes.
72-7-404.   Maximum gross weight limitation for vehicles -- Bridge formula for weight limitations -- Minimum mandatory fines.

(1) (a)  As used in this section:

(i)  "Axle load" means the total load on all wheels whose centers may be included between two parallel transverse vertical planes 40 inches apart.

(ii)  "Tandem axle" means two or more axles spaced not less than 40 inches nor more than 96 inches apart and having at least one common point of weight suspension.

(b)  The tire load rating shall be marked on the tire sidewall.  A tire, wheel, or axle may not carry a greater weight than the manufacturer's rating.

(2) (a)  A vehicle may not be operated or moved on any highway in the state with:

(i)  a gross weight in excess of 10,500 pounds on one wheel;

(ii)  a single axle load in excess of 20,000 pounds; or

(iii)  a tandem axle load in excess of 34,000 pounds.

(b)  Subject to the limitations of Subsection (3), the gross vehicle weight of any vehicle or combination of vehicles may not exceed 80,000 pounds.

(3) (a)  Subject to the limitations in Subsection (2), no group of two or more consecutive axles between the first and last axle of a vehicle or combination of vehicles and no vehicle or combination of vehicles may carry a gross weight in excess of the weight provided by the following bridge formula, except as provided in Subsection (3)(b):

W = 500 {LN/(N-1) + 12N+36}

(i)  W = overall gross weight on any group of two or more consecutive axles to the nearest 500 pounds.

(ii)  L = distance in feet between the extreme of any group of two or more consecutive axles.  When the distance in feet includes a fraction of a foot of one inch or more the next larger number of feet shall be used.

(iii)  N = number of axles in the group under consideration.

(b)  Two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross  weight of 34,000 pounds each if the overall distance between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets of tandem axles is 36 feet or more.

(4)  Any exception to this section must be authorized by an overweight permit as provided in Section 72-7-406.

(5) (a)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor except that, notwithstanding Sections 76-3-301 and 76-3-302, the violator shall pay the largest minimum mandatory fine of either:

(i)  $50 plus the sum of the overweight axle fines calculated under Subsection (5)(b); or

(ii)  $50 plus the gross vehicle weight fine calculated under Subsection (5)(b).

(b)  The fine for each axle and a gross vehicle weight violation shall be calculated according to the following schedule:

 



Number of Pounds Overweight

Axle Fine (Cents per Pound for Each Overweight Axle)

Gross Vehicle Weight Fine(Cents per Pound)

 

1 - 2,000



0



0



 

2,001 - 5,000



4



5



 

5,001 - 8,000



5



5



 

8,001 - 12,000



6



5



 

12,001 - 16,000



7



5



 

16,001 - 20,000



9



5



 

20,001 - 25,000



11



5



 

25,001 or more



13



5







Amended by Chapter 21, 1999 General Session

